Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.183.060

Model policy and procedures.

(1) By August 1, 2022, and periodically thereafter, the Washington state school directors' association must collaborate with the office of the superintendent of public instruction to update a model policy and procedures for implementing a language access program for culturally responsive, systemic family engagement.

(a) When updating the model policy and procedures, the Washington state school directors' association must perform a racial equity impact analysis that involves the community.

(b) The model policy and procedure must include procedures for the school district board of directors to annually review the spending on and the need for language access services.

(c) The model policy and procedure must address procedures for effective communication with students' families who are deaf, deaf and blind, blind, hard of hearing, or need other communication assistance.

(d) The elements of the model policy and procedures must take into consideration the recommendations in the 2020 and 2021 reports of the language access work group.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the Washington state school directors' association must maintain the model policy and procedures on each agency's website, at no cost to school districts.

[ 2022 c 107 s 9.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2022 c 107: See note following RCW 28A.183.010.